District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Volunteer Services Clarification Temporary Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Section 3 of the Volunteers Services Act of 1977, effective June 28, 1977 (D.C.
Law 2-12; D.C. Official Code § 1-319.02), is amended by striking the phrase “District of Columbia
Board of Education” and inserting the phrase “District of Columbia Board of Education, Attorney
General for the District of Columbia,” in its place.
Sec. 3. The Juvenile Curfew Act of 1995, effective September 20, 1995 (D.C. Law 11-48;
D.C. Official Code § 2-1541 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 3 (D.C. Official Code § 2-1542) is amended as follows:
(1) Paragraph (1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) “Chief of Police” means the Chief of the Metropolitan Police Department.”.
(2) A new paragraph (1A) is added to read as follows:
“(1A) “Curfew hours” means:
“(A) During every month except July and August:
“(i) From 11:00 p.m. on every Sunday, Monday, Tuesday,
Wednesday, and Thursday, until 6:00 a.m. on the following day; and
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(ii) From 12:01 a.m. until 6:00 a.m. on every Saturday and
Sunday;
“(B) During the months of July and August, from 12:01 a.m. until 6:00
a.m. every day;
“(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B) of this paragraph, during
the months of September, October, and November 2025, from 11:00 p.m. on every day until 6:00
a.m. on the following day;
“(D) Extended curfew hours established by the Mayor pursuant to section
3a; and
“(E) Extended curfew hours in extended juvenile curfew zones established
by the Chief of Police pursuant to section 3b.”.
(3) Paragraph (5) is amended by striking the phrase “under the age of 17 years”
and inserting the phrase “under the age of 18 years” in its place.
(4) A new paragraph (6A) is added to read as follows:
“(6A) “Notice of violation of curfew” means a verbal warning, authorized by an
official that informs a groups of juveniles that they are violating the terms of a curfew, that they
may be arrested if they continue to violate the curfew, and identifies reasonable steps that they
can take to leave the area to avoid arrest.”.
(b) New sections 3a and 3b are added to read as follows:
“Sec. 3a. Temporary extensions of juvenile curfew hours.
“(a) The Mayor may, by issuance of an administrative order pursuant to section 422(11)
of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, effective December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 790; D.C.
Official Code § 1-204.22(11), extend the juvenile curfew hours in the District, or any part of the
District, beyond the hours established in section 3(1A)(A), (B), and (C), if the Mayor determines
that such an extension is appropriate to protect public safety or public or private property.
“(b) An administrative order issued by the Mayor under subsection (a) of this section
shall:
“(1) State the basis for the extension of the juvenile curfew hours;
“(2) State the locations in the District where the extended juvenile curfew hours
shall apply or state that the extended juvenile curfew hours shall apply throughout the District;
and
“(3) State the days and hours during which the extended juvenile curfew hours
shall be in effect; provided, that the extended juvenile curfew hours:
“(A) Shall not begin earlier than 8:00 p.m., nor extend past 6:00 a.m., on
any day;
“(B) Shall not remain in effect for more than 4 consecutive days, except as
provided in subsection (e) of this section; and
“(C) Shall not apply to groups of 8 or fewer individuals.
2

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c) Except where emergency circumstances, as determined by the Mayor and described
in the administrative order issued under subsection (a) of this section, warrant otherwise,
extended juvenile curfew hours imposed under this section shall not take effect until at least 24
hours after the issuance of the administrative order.
“(d) Notice of the issuance of each administrative order issued under this section shall be
promptly posted on the main website of the District government and on the website of the
Metropolitan Police Department.
“(e) The Mayor may extend the time period during which extended juvenile curfew hours
imposed by this section shall remain in effect by issuing subsequent Mayor’s orders extending
the time period; provided, that each such extension of the time period shall not exceed 30 days.
“(f) If members of the Metropolitan Police Department discover juveniles in the
designated extended juvenile curfew hours zone during the hours of curfew, the Metropolitan
Police Department shall:
“(1) Where there:
“(A) Is not an imminent danger of bodily injury of significant damage to
property, issue at least 2 clearly audible and understandable notices of violation of curfew; or
“(B) Is imminent danger of bodily injury or significant damage to
property, issue at least one clearly audible and understandable notice of violation of curfew;
“(2) Provide juveniles a reasonable and adequate time to disperse; and
“(3) Capture on body-worn camera each component of the order to return home
described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
“Sec. 3b. Temporary designations of extended juvenile curfew hour zones.
“(a) The Chief of Police may designate any area of the District as an extended juvenile
curfew hours zone, in which extended juvenile curfew hours determined by the Chief of Police
shall apply, if the Chief of Police determines that the designation of the extended juvenile curfew
hours zone is appropriate to protect public safety or public or private property in the extended
juvenile curfew hours zone.
“(b) To designate an extended juvenile curfew hours zone, the Chief of Police shall issue
an order that includes:
“(1) The basis for the designation of the extended juvenile curfew hours zone;
“(2) The boundaries of the extended juvenile curfew hours zone; and
“(3) The days and hours of the extended juvenile curfew hours in the extended
juvenile curfew hours zone; provided, that the extended juvenile curfew hours in the extended
juvenile curfew hours zone:
“(A) Shall not begin earlier than 8:00 p.m., nor extend past 6:00 a.m., on
any day;
“(B) Shall not remain in effect for more than 4 consecutive days, except as
provided in subsection (e) of this section; and
“(C) Shall not apply to groups of 8 or fewer individuals.
3

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(c) In determining whether to designate an extended juvenile curfew hours zone, the
Chief of Police shall consider the following:
“(1) Within the preceding 30 days, the occurrence of:
“(A) Juvenile curfew violations in the proposed extended juvenile curfew
hours zone;
“(B) Police reports of disturbances of the public peace described in section
1 of An Act To confer concurrent jurisdiction on the police court of the District of Columbia in
certain cases, approved July 16, 1912 (37 Stat. 192; D.C. Official Code § 22-1301), sections 6, 3,
9, or 16 of An act for the preservation of the public peace and the protection of property within
the District of Columbia, approved July 29, 1892 (27 Stat. 323; D.C. Official Code §§ 22-1307,
22-1309, 22-1312, or 22-1318), section 211 of the District of Columbia Law Enforcement Act of
1953, approved June 29, 1953 (67 Stat. 98; D.C. Official Code § 22-1321), or section 901 of An
Act relating to crime and criminal procedure in the District of Columbia, approved December27,
1967 (81 Stat. 742; D.C. Official Code § 22-1322), in the proposed extended juvenile curfew
hours zone;
“(C) Police reports of dangerous crimes, as that term is defined in D.C.
Official Code § 23-1331(3), in the proposed extended juvenile curfew hours zone;
“(D) Police reports of crimes of violence, as that term is defined in D.C.
Official Code § 23-1331(4), in the proposed extended juvenile curfew hours zone; or
“(E) Police reports of destruction of or damage to public or private
property in the proposed extended juvenile curfew hours zone;
“(2) Intelligence or verifiable information indicative of an intent of 9 or more
juveniles to gather in the proposed extended juvenile curfew hours zone in such a manner that is
likely to result in substantial harm to the public safety, or the safety of those gathering, or
substantial damage to public or private property; and
“(3) Any other verifiable information from which the Chief of Police may
ascertain that public safety or public or private property in the proposed extended juvenile
curfew hours zone is likely to be endangered by the presence of unaccompanied juveniles in the
extended juvenile curfew hours zones.
“(d) Upon the designation of an extended juvenile curfew hours zone the Chief of Police
shall post notice of the designation on the website of the Metropolitan Police Department and
shall post signs in the immediate area of the extended juvenile curfew hours zone.
“(e) The Chief of Police may extend the duration of the designation of an extended
juvenile curfew hours zone to 30 days by issuing a subsequent order extending the duration of
the designation.
“(f) If members of the Metropolitan Police Department discover juveniles in the
designated extended juvenile curfew zone during the hours of curfew, the Metropolitan Police
Department shall:
“(1) Where there:
4

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
“(A) Is not an imminent danger of bodily injury or significant damage to
property, issue at least 2 clearly audible and understandable notices of violation of curfew; or
“(B) Is imminent danger of bodily injury or significant damage to
property, issue at least one clearly audible and understandable notice of violation of curfew;
“(2) Provide juveniles a reasonable and adequate time to disperse; and
“(3) Capture on body-worn camera each component of the order to return home
described in paragraph (1) of this subsection.
“(g)(1) An Advisory Neighborhood Commission, business improvement district, or Main
Street organization may petition the Chief of Police to establish an extended juvenile curfew
hours zone in an area covered by, or adjacent to the area covered by, such entity. Such petition
shall be approved by a formal vote of the members of the Advisory Neighborhood Commission,
the members of the board of the business improvement district, or the members of the board of
the Main Street organization.
“(2) A petition submitted pursuant to this subsection shall include the following
information:
“(A) The proposed boundaries of the extended juvenile curfew hours zone;
“(B) The proposed hours of the extended juvenile curfew;
“(C) The proposed duration, in days, of the proposed extended juvenile
curfew hours;
“(D) The reasons why the Advisory Neighborhood Commission, business
improvement district, or Main Street organization is requesting the designation of an extended
juvenile curfew hours zone; and
“(E) Such other information as the Chief of Police may require.
“(3) Consideration of a petition submitted under this section, and the
determination of whether to designate an extended juvenile curfew hours zone in response to the
petition, shall be at the sole discretion of the Chief of Police.”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
5

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
6